Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2302
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation references; how construed.

For purposes of any law requiring a bank, capital stock financial institution as defined under section 77-2366, or qualifying mutual financial institution as defined under section 77-2365.01 to secure the deposit of public money or public funds in excess of the amount insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, references to amounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall include amounts guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Laws 2009, LB259, § 26.